Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.410

Nonresident pharmacies—Rules.

The commission may adopt rules to implement the provisions of RCW 18.64.350 through 18.64.400 and 18.64.420.

[ 2013 c 19 s 24; 1991 c 87 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 87: See note following RCW 18.64.350.